Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3310
Act, liberally construed.

The Offstreet Parking District Act shall be liberally construed.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 10, p. 200;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-821;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 10, p. 440;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 188.